Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3203
Conflict of laws; limitation periods.

(1)(a) Except as provided by section 25-3205 and subsection (2) of this section, if a claim is substantively based:

(i) Upon the law of one other state, the limitation period of that state applies; or

(ii) Upon the law of more than one state, the limitation period of one of those states chosen by the law of conflict of laws of this state applies.

(b) The limitation period of this state applies to all other claims.

(2) If a cause of action arises outside of this state and the action is barred under the applicable statute of limitations of the place where it arose, the action may be maintained in this state if the plaintiff is a resident of this state who has owned the cause of action since it accrued and the cause of action is not barred under the applicable statute of limitations of this state.

Laws 2006, LB 1115, § 3.